Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1250.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Laws 2023, chapter 71, article 1, section 3, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Hennepin County; deleted text begin Anaerobic Digesterdeleted text end new text begin Recycling Recovery Facilitynew text end 26,000,000 For a grant to Hennepin County to predesign, design, construct, furnish, and equip a deleted text begin new anaerobic digestiondeleted text end new text begin recycling recoverynew text end facility in the city of Brooklyn Park.new text begin This project includes the demolition of the Hennepin County Sheriff's facility at the site to make room for the recycling recovery facility.new text end deleted text begin This appropriation is not available until Hennepin County submits a plan for the cessation of operations at the Hennepin Energy Recovery Center to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with primary jurisdiction over capital investment and environment and natural resources. deleted text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end